bibisco/dictionaries/es_MX/es_MX.dic
abarquillar/IPRSTVWX
abisagrar/PSVWX
abotagar/IPRSVWX
abuchear/PSVWX
academizar/PSTVWX
acardenalar/PSVWX
acepar/PSVWX
achichihuar/LPRSTVWX
acobardar/IPRSTVWX
aconsejar/PRSTVWX
acrecentar/IPRSTWX
acubilar/PSVWX
adecenar/PSTVWX
adoctrinar/IPSTVWX
adverbializar/PSVWX
aflautar/PRSTVWX
agarrotar/IPRSTVWX
agradar/PRSVWX
aguzar/IPSVWX
ahumar/PSWX
alambicar/IPSVWX
alcalizar/HPSVWX
alfalfar/PSVWX
alijar/PSVWX
almorzar/PSWX
alumbrar/ILPRSTVWX
amamantar/IPSTVWX
amarizar/PSVWX
ameritar/PRSTVWX
amoratar/PRSVWX
amuermar/PRSTVWX
aneblar/PSVWX
antecoger/OQRTUVWX
apaciguar/IPRSTWX
aparvar/PSVWX
apenar/IPRSTVWX
aplacar/IPRSTVWX
aporrar/PSVWX
apuñadar/PSVWX
arcaizar/LPSTWX
arpillar/PSVWX
arrebujar/PSVWX
arrodear/IPSVWX
asechar/IPSVWX
asimilar/HPRSTVWX
asurar/IPSVWX
ataracear/PSTVWX
atiborrar/PRSTVWX
atrabancar/PSVWX
atrojar/PRSTVWX
autenticar/HPRSTVWX
avergonzar/PRSWX
ayustar/PSVWX
babosear/PSVWX
baldar/IPSVWX
barajar/APRSTVWX
barrar/PSTVWX
bastonear/PSVWX
bellotear/PSVWX
bizcar/PSVWX
bocinar/PSVWX
bordear/PSTVWX
bribonear/PSVWX
buitrear/PSVWX
cabecear/IPSVWX
cachondear/PRSVWX
calcular/HPRSTUVWX
camorrear/PSVWX
canturrear/PSVWX
carbonatar/PSVWX
carretear/PSVWX
catar/PSVWX
cegar/IPRSTWX
cerner/VWX
chancletear/PSVWX
charlotear/PSVWX
chirriar/PSWX
chuflar/PSVWX
cinematografiar/PSTWX
clasificar/HPRSTUVWX
cobrar/PRSTUVWX
cojear/PSVWX
comarcar/PSVWX
compartir/HIOQRTVWX
comulgar/LPSVWX
concursar/LPSVWX
conformar/HPRSVWX
conreinar/PSVWX
constreñir/QWY
contornear/PSVWX
contraponer/OQRTWY
conversar/HPSVWX
corear/PSVWX
coser/OQRTVWX
creer/OQWY
crujir/VWX
cucharear/PSVWX
cuquear/PSTVWX
decaer/IWY
defenecer/IWX
deletrear/PRSTUVWX
denotar/HPSVWX
derivar/HPRSTVWX
desaceitar/PSTVWX
desafiar/PSWX
desalabar/PSVWX
desamar/PSTVWX
desaparecer/IWX
desarrancar/PRSVWX
desatancar/PSVWX
desayudar/PSVWX
desbinzar/PSVWX
descabritar/PSVWX
descantillar/PSVWX
descartar/PRSTVWX
descerrajar/PSVWX
descollar/IPSWX
desconformar/PSVWX
descostillar/PSVWX
descubrir/IOQRTVWY
desembalsar/PSTVWX
desembrazar/PSVWX
desempozar/PSVWX
desencapotar/PSVWX
desenfadar/PRSTVWX
desengrasar/PSTVWX
desensañar/PSVWX
desentronizar/PSVWX
desestancar/PSTVWX
desfrenar/IPSVWX
desgoznar/PSVWX
deshelar/PRSTWX
deshonrar/PRSTVWX
desinsectar/HPSVWX
deslegalizar/PSTVWX
desmamar/PSVWX
desmembrar/HPRSTWX
desmultiplicar/HPSTVWX
desojar/PSVWX
desoxigenar/HLPSVWX
despapar/PSVWX
despeinar/PRSTVWX
despestañar/PSVWX
desplayar/PSVWX
despresurizar/HPRSTVWX
desreglar/PRSTVWX
destemplar/PSVWX
destriunfar/PSVWX
desvalijar/IPSVWX
desvitrificar/PSVWX
devenir/WY
dificultar/PSTVWX
dirimir/VWX
diseñar/PRSTUVWX
dispersar/PRSTVWX
dobladillar/PSVWX
dramatizar/HPSTVWX
editar/PRSTUVWX
elidir/VWX
embalumar/PSVWX
embaucar/IPSTVWX
embobinar/PSVWX
embotijar/PSVWX
embrutecer/IWX
empalagar/IPRSTVWX
emparedar/IPSVWX
empelotar/PRSVWX
emplantillar/PSVWX
empradizar/PSVWX
enalbar/PSVWX
encañizar/PSVWX
encalar/PSVWX
encanastar/PSVWX
encapsular/IPRSTUVWX
encartuchar/PSVWX
enceldar/IPSVWX
enchinarrar/PSVWX
encodillar/PRSVWX
encorchar/PSVWX
encuerar/PSVWX
endurar/PSVWX
enfilar/PSTVWX
enfurtir/VWX
engarmar/PRSVWX
engorar/PSWX
engrudar/IPSVWX
enhebillar/PSVWX
enjuncar/PSVWX
enlodazar/PSVWX
enmaridar/PSVWX
enracimar/PRSVWX
enriscar/IPSVWX
ensalzar/IPSTVWX
ensoñar/HPSWX
entallar/IPSVWX
entorpecer/IWX
entrecruzar/PRSTVWX
entreuntar/PSVWX
entumecer/IOQRTWX
envenenar/IPRSTVWX
enzalamar/PSVWX
erutar/HPSVWX
escalar/IPSTVWX
escandallar/PSVWX
escarmenar/PSVWX
escocer/IORVWX
escriturar/PSVWX
esdrujulizar/PSVWX
españolear/PSVWX
especializar/HPRSVWX
espirar/HPSVWX
esquebrajar/PRSTUVWX
estambrar/PRSTUVWX
estilizar/HPRSTUVWX
estrechar/IPRSTUVWX
esturar/PRSTUVWX
exasperar/HPRSTVWX
exorcizar/PSVWX
extender/OQRTUWX
eyacular/HPRSVWX
falsificar/HPSTVWX
federar/HPRSTUVWX
filar/PRSTUVWX
flaquear/PSVWX
formalizar/HPRSTUVWX
frailear/PSTVWX
fructificar/HPSVWX
gallardear/PSVWX
garbillar/PSVWX
germanizar/HPRSTVWX
golosinear/PSVWX
granear/PSVWX
gualdrapear/PSVWX
gusanear/PSVWX
hambrear/PSVWX
helear/PSTVWX
herrenar/PSVWX
hirmar/PSVWX
hondear/PSVWX
hozar/PSVWX
husmear/PSTVWX
imbursar/HPSVWX
imprimar/HPSTVWX
incitar/HILPSTVWX
indexar/HPSTVWX
inflar/HPRSTUVWX
ininterrumpir/NOQRTUVWX
insinuar/HLPRSTUWX
intelectualizar/PSTVWX
intimidar/HPRSVWX
invitar/HPRSTVWX
jalar/PRSVWX
jaspear/PSVWX
judaizar/HLPSWX
lacrar/PSVWX
lampear/PSVWX
latiguear/PSVWX
legrar/HPSVWX
licitar/HPSVWX
litar/HPSVWX
localizar/HPRSTVWX
mañanear/PSVWX
maestrear/PSVWX
malentender/OQRTWX
mamar/PRSTVWX
manifestar/HLPRSTWX
maquinizar/HPSTVWX
marlotar/PSVWX
masturbar/HPRSTUVWX
mecanizar/HPSVWX
menear/PRSTUVWX
mermar/PSVWX
migar/PSVWX
misar/PSVWX
modorrar/PSVWX
monear/PSVWX
mordiscar/PSVWX
motorizar/HPSVWX
multiplexar/HPSTVWX
nalguear/PSVWX
negreguear/PSVWX
noruestear/PSVWX
observar/HLPRSTVWX
ojear/PSTVWX
opositar/PSVWX
osar/PSVWX
padrear/PSVWX
palomear/PSVWX
papelonear/PSVWX
parlar/LPSVWX
pasterizar/HPSTVWX
pedalear/PSVWX
pensar/IPRSTUWX
perifonear/PSVWX
perseverar/LPSVWX
petardear/PSVWX
pimpollear/PSVWX
pircar/PSVWX
placear/PSVWX
pleitear/PSVWX
politiquear/PSVWX
pordiosear/PSVWX
potajier/VWX
predeterminar/HPRSTVWX
prenotar/PSVWX
prevalecer/LWX
profanar/HIPSTVWX
propalar/PSTVWX
proyectar/LPRSTVWX
puntar/HPSVWX
quemar/ILPRSTUVWX
racanear/PSVWX
rallar/PSVWX
rascuñar/PSVWX
ratigar/PSVWX
realzar/PSTVWX
rebasar/PRSTVWX
rebumbar/PSVWX
recapitular/HPSVWX
rechizar/PSVWX
recoger/IOQRTUVWX
reconstruir/OQWYZ
recuadrar/PSVWX
redistribuir/OQWY
reestructurar/HPSTVWX
refractar/PSVWX
regir/IQWY
rehilar/PSWX
rejalgar/PSVWX
relinchar/PSVWX
remilgar/PRSVWX
renacer/ILWX
repeinar/PSVWX
replicar/HPRSTVWX
reputar/HPSVWX
reseñar/PSTVWX
respaldar/PRSTVWX
restaurar/HLPRSTVWX
retejar/PSVWX
retrancar/PSTVWX
reunir/OQRTUWX
revirar/PSVWX
ridiculizar/PSTVWX
rojear/PSVWX
rosquear/PSVWX
rumbar/PSVWX
sabotear/PSTVWX
salgar/PSVWX
sambenitar/PSVWX
señalizar/HPSTVWX
senderar/PSVWX
sesgar/NPSTVWX
sincerar/PRSTVWX
sobajar/IPSVWX
sobrecrecer/LWX
sobresalir/LWX
socorrer/OQRTVWX
solicitar/HLPRSTUVWX
sonetear/PSVWX
sopuntar/PSVWX
sublimar/HPRSTVWX
sucumbir/LVWX
suplicar/HLPRSTUVWX
sutilizar/PSTVWX
talonear/PSVWX
tardear/PSVWX
templar/IPSVWX
tiranizar/HPSVWX
toxicar/PSVWX
translimitar/HPSVWX
trasladar/HPRSTVWX
traumatizar/PRSTVWX
trompetear/PSVWX
ubicar/HPRSTVWX
vaguear/HPSVWX
veranear/LPSVWX
vituperar/HPSVWX
zampar/PRSTVWX
zurear/PSVWX
